Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-418
Intentional
violations; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful
for any person knowingly or intentionally:

(a) Who is a registrant to distribute a controlled substance
classified in Schedule I or II of section 28-405 in the course of his or her
legitimate business except in
compliance with section 28-413;

(b) To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution
of a controlled substance a registration number which is fictitious, revoked,
suspended, or issued to another person;

(c) To acquire or obtain or to attempt to acquire or obtain
possession of a controlled substance by theft, misrepresentation, fraud, forgery,
deception, or subterfuge;

(d) To furnish false or fraudulent material information in
or omit any material information from any application, report, or other document
required to be kept or filed under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or
any record required to be kept by the act;

(e) To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate,
stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark,
trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any
likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof
so as to render such drug a counterfeit controlled substance;

(f) Who is subject to sections 28-406 to 28-414.05 to
distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of sections 28-414 to 28-414.05;

(g) Who is a registrant to manufacture a controlled substance
not authorized by his or her registration or to distribute or dispense a controlled
substance not authorized by his or her registration to another registrant
or authorized person;

(h) To possess a false or forged medical order for a controlled
substance issued by a practitioner authorized to prescribe, except that this
subdivision shall not apply to law enforcement officials, practitioners, or
attorneys in the performance of their official lawful duties; or

(i) To communicate information to a practitioner in an effort
to unlawfully procure a controlled substance, the administration of a controlled
substance, or a medical order for a controlled substance issued by a practitioner
authorized to prescribe.

(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty
of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 78;

Laws 1988, LB 273, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB811, § 15.